California, session 20252026, SB1334.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 359 of the Streets and Highways Code is amended to read:359. (a) Route 59 is from:(1) Route 152 northerly to Route 99 near the City of Merced.(2) Route 99 near the City of Merced to Snelling.(b) On or before December 31, 2030, the commission shall reach an agreement with the Counties of Merced, Stanislaus, and Tuolumne for the acquisition and adoption of county road J59, also known as La Grange Road, from its intersection with junction of Routes 108 and 120 to its intersection with Route 59. The terms of the acquisition shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) The acquisition shall occur on or before December 31, 2030.(2) Agreed-upon road repairs Repairs for road damage as proposed by the Counties of Merced, Stanislaus, and Tuolumne shall be completed by December 31, 2030. Tuolumne.(3) The road shall be adopted into the state highway system as part of Route 59.(4) The Counties of Merced, Stanislaus, and Tuolumne shall not be required to upgrade county road J59 to meet state highway standards before the road is adopted as part of Route 59.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 359 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:359. (a) Route 59 is from:(1) Route 152 northerly to Route 99 near the City of Merced.(2) Route 99 near the City of Merced to the junction of Routes 108 and 120.(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2031.